Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.150

Licenses required—Use of public law enforcement insignia prohibited—Penalties—Enforcement.

(1) After June 30, 1992, any person who performs the functions and duties of a private investigator in this state without being licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or any person presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the license of another, or any person who gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the director in obtaining a license, or any person who falsely impersonates any other licensee, or any person who attempts to use an expired or revoked license, or any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) After January 1, 1992, a person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she owns or operates a private investigator agency in this state without first obtaining a private investigator agency license.

(3) After June 30, 1992, the owner or qualifying agent of a private investigator agency is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she employs any person to perform the duties of a private investigator without the employee having in his or her possession a permanent private investigator license issued by the department. This shall not preclude a private investigator agency from requiring applicants to attend preassignment training classes or from paying wages for attending the required preassignment training classes.

(4) After June 30, 1992, a person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she performs the functions and duties of an armed private investigator in this state unless the person holds a valid armed private investigator license issued by the department.

(5) After June 30, 1992, it is a gross misdemeanor for a private investigator agency to hire, contract with, or otherwise engage the services of an unlicensed armed private investigator knowing that the private investigator does not have a valid armed private investigator license issued by the director.

(6) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to possess or use any vehicle or equipment displaying the word "police" or "law enforcement officer" or having any sign, shield, marking, accessory, or insignia that indicates that the equipment or vehicle belongs to a public law enforcement agency.

(7) It is the duty of all officers of the state and political subdivisions thereof to enforce the provisions of this chapter. The attorney general shall act as legal adviser of the director, and render such legal assistance as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1995 c 277 s 33; 1991 c 328 s 15.]